src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! !!!Pronouns
!! ----

!! Hill Mari (Western Mari) pronouns...

LEXICON PRON_
 +Pron: WORDEND ;

LEXICON PERS-SG1
  +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:нь    K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:ньӹн  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:ньӹм  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:лӓнем K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Cmpr:ньлӓ  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Com:ньге  K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
  +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:нь    K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen:ньӹн  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:ньӹм  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:лӓнет K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Cmpr:ньлӓ  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com:ньге  K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
  +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:      K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen:%>н   K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:%>м   K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat:%>лӓн K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Cmpr:%>лӓ  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com:%>ге  K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1
  +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:        K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen:мнӓ%>н  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:мнӓ%>м  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:%>лӓннӓ K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Cmpr:%>лӓ    K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com:%>ге    K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL2
  +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:        K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen:мдӓ%>н  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:мдӓ%>м  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:%>лӓндӓ K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Cmpr:%>лӓ    K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com:%>ге    K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL3 !!= @CODE@ нӹнӹ:нӹнӹ
  +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:      K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:%>н   K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:%>м   K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat:%>лӓн K ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Cmpr:%>лӓ  K ;
  +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com:%>ге  K ;

LEXICON REFL !!= @CODE@ ӹшке:ӹшк
      +Pron+Refl+Dep:е          K ;
      +Pron+Refl+Gen:ӹмӹ%>н     K ;
      +Pron+Refl+Acc:ӹмӹ%>м     K ;
      +Pron+Refl+Dat:ӹ%>лӓн     K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen:ӹмемӹ%>н   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg1+Acc:ӹмемӹ%>м   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat:ӹ%>лӓнем   K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen:ӹметӹ%>н   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg2+Acc:ӹметӹ%>м   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat:ӹ%>лӓнет   K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen:ӹмжӹ%>н    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg3+Acc:ӹмжӹ%>м    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat:ӹ%>лӓнжӹ   K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Pl1+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen:ӹмнӓ%>н    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl1+Acc:ӹмнӓ%>м    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat:ӹ%>лӓннӓ   K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl2+Gen:ӹмдӓ%>н    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl2+Acc:ӹмдӓ%>м    K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat:ӹ%>лӓндӓ   K ;

! +Pron+Refl+Pl3+Nom:е          K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen:ӹмӹшт%>н   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl3+Acc:ӹмӹшт%>м   K ;
  +Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat:ӹ%>лӓнӹштӹ K ;

LEXICON DEM-SG !!= @CODE@ тидӹ:ти
     +Pron+Dem+Dep:             WORDEND ;
  +Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:дӹ           K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:дӹ%>н        K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc:дӹ%>м        K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Sg+Dat:дӹ%>лӓн      K       ;
 +Pron+Dem+Sg+Cmpr:дӹ%>лӓ       K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Sg+Com:дӹ%>ге       K       ;

  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:дӹ%>влӓ      K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen:дӹ%>влӓ%>н   K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc:дӹ%>влӓ%>м   K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:дӹ%>влӓ%>лӓн K       ;
 +Pron+Dem+Pl+Cmpr:дӹ%>влӓ%>лӓ  K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Com:дӹ%>влӓ%>ге  K       ;

LEXICON DEM-PL !!= @CODE@ нинӹ:ни
        +Pron+Dem+Dep:             WORDEND ;
     +Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:нӹ           K       ;
     +Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen:нӹ%>н        K       ;
     +Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc:нӹ%>м        K       ;
     +Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:нӹ%>лӓн      K       ;
    +Pron+Dem+Pl+Cmpr:нӹ%>лӓ       K       ;
     +Pron+Dem+Pl+Com:нӹ%>ге       K       ;
!! Plural pronoun with additional plural marking
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Nom:нӹ%>влӓ      K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Gen:нӹ%>влӓ%>н   K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Acc:нӹ%>влӓ%>м   K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Dat:нӹ%>влӓ%>лӓн K       ;
 +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Cmpr:нӹ%>влӓ%>лӓ  K       ;
  +Pron+Dem+Pl+Pl+Com:нӹ%>влӓ%>ге  K       ;


LEXICON DemTag
  +Dem+Adn: WORDEND ;
 +Dem+Pron: Dem-Cx  ;
!! What are these тӹдӹмӓт, тӹдӹлӓнӓт

LEXICON Dem-Cx
 +Sg+Nom:                K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>н             K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>м             K ;
 +Sg+Dat:%>л%{аӓ%}н      K ;

 +Pl+Nom:%>влӓ           K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>влӓ%>н        K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>влӓ%>м        K ;
 +Pl+Dat:%>влӓ%>л%{аӓ%}н K ;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
