src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
весӹ+Pron:весӹ PRON_  "toinen" ;
ик+Pron:ик PRON_  "eräs" ;
икманяр+Pron:икманяр PRON_  "muutama" ;
икманярын+Pron:икманярын PRON_  "muutaman" ;
икмахань+Pron:икмахань PRON_  "jokin" ;
иктӓ-весӹ+Pron:иктӓ-весӹ PRON_  "joku toinen" ;
иктӓ-вӓре+Pron:иктӓ-вӓре PRON_  "jossain muualla" ;
иктӓ-гӓнӓ+Pron:иктӓ-гӓнӓ PRON_  "joskus" ;
иктӓ-кыды+Pron:иктӓ-кыды PRON_  "jokin" ;
иктӓ-кыце+Pron:иктӓ-кыце PRON_  "jotenkin" ;
иктӓ-кыш+Pron:иктӓ-кыш PRON_  "johonkin" ;
иктӓ-кышак+Pron:иктӓ-кышак PRON_  "johonkin" ;
иктӓ-кышан+Pron:иктӓ-кышан PRON_  "johonkin" ;
иктӓ-кышец+Pron:иктӓ-кышец PRON_  "jostakin" ;
иктӓ-кӱ+Pron:иктӓ-кӱ PRON_  "joku" ;
иктӓ-ма+Pron:иктӓ-ма PRON_  "jokin" ;
иктӓ-ма-гӹнят+Pron:иктӓ-ма-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
иктӓ-мазар+Pron:иктӓ-мазар PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ-мазары+Pron:иктӓ-мазары PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ-маняр+Pron:иктӓ-маняр PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ-маняры+Pron:иктӓ-маняры PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ-махань+Pron:иктӓ-махань PRON_  "jonkinlainen" ;
иктӓ-маханьы+Pron:иктӓ-маханьы PRON_  "jonkinlainen" ;
иктӓжӹ+Pron:иктӓжӹ PRON_  "joku" ;
иктӓт+Pron:иктӓт PRON_  "kukaan" ;
иктӓ•-маняр-гӹнят+Pron:иктӓ-маняр-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ•-маняры-гӹнят+Pron:иктӓ-маняры-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
иктӓ•-махань-гӹнят+Pron:иктӓ-махань-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkinlainen" ;
иктӓ•-маханьы-гӹнят+Pron:иктӓ-маханьы-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkinlainen" ;
иктӹ+Pron:иктӹ PRON_  "yksi" ;
иктӹ-весӹ+Pron:иктӹ-весӹ PRON_  "toinen toisen" ;
иктӹт+Pron:иктӹт PRON_  "yksi" ;
икӓнӓ-иктӹ+Pron:икӓнӓ-иктӹ PRON_  "toinen toisen" ;
икӹжӓк-иктӹ+Pron:икӹжӓк-иктӹ PRON_  "toinen toisen" ;
йылхи+Pron:йылхи PRON_  "" ;
йыхи-яхи+Pron:йыхи-яхи PRON_  "" ;
каждый+Pron:каждый PRON_  "jokainen" ;
керек-кынам+Pron:керек-кынам PRON_  "" ;
керек-кынар+Pron:керек-кынар PRON_  "" ;
керек-кышак+Pron:керек-кышак PRON_  "" ;
керек-кышец+Pron:керек-кышец PRON_  "" ;
керек-кышкы+Pron:керек-кышкы PRON_  "" ;
керек-кышты+Pron:керек-кышты PRON_  "" ;
керек-кӱ+Pron:керек-кӱ PRON_  "kuka tahansa" ;
керек-ма+Pron:керек-ма PRON_  "mikä tahansa" ;
керек-маняр+Pron:керек-маняр PRON_  "" ;
керек-махань+Pron:керек-махань PRON_  "minkälainen tahansa" ;
кыды+Pron:кыды PRON_  "kuka" ;
кыды-гӹнят+Pron:кыды-гӹнят PRON_  "kuka tahansa" ;
кыды-кынам+Pron:кыды-кынам PRON_  "" ;
кыды-кынар+Pron:кыды-кынар PRON_  "" ;
кыды-кышкевек+Pron:кыды-кышкевек PRON_  "" ;
кыды-тидӹ+Pron:кыды-тидӹ PRON_  "" ;
кыдыжы+Pron:кыдыжы PRON_  "kuka näistä; kumpi näistä" ;
кынам-гӹнят+Pron:кынам-гӹнят PRON_  "joskus" ;
кынамеш+Pron:кынамеш PRON_  "mihin aikaan" ;
кынамшы+Pron:кынамшы PRON_  "minkä aikainen" ;
кынар-гӹнят+Pron:кынар-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
кынары+Pron:кынары PRON_  "montako" ;
кыце+Pron:кыце PRON_  "miten" ;
кыце-шон+Pron:кыце-шон PRON_  "miten vain" ;
кыцежӹ-мажы+Pron:кыцежӹ-мажы PRON_  "" ;
кышак+Pron:кышак PRON_  "mihin" ;
кышак-тишӓк+Pron:кышак-тишӓк PRON_  "" ;
кышак-ӓнят+Pron:кышак-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
кышакен-гӹнят+Pron:кышакен-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
кышец-гӹнят+Pron:кышец-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
кышец-шон+Pron:кышец-шон PRON_  "" ;
кышецын+Pron:кышецын PRON_  "" ;
кышкевек-гӹнят+Pron:кышкевек-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
кышкевек-ӓнят+Pron:кышкевек-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
кышкы-гӹнят+Pron:кышкы-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
кышкы-шон+Pron:кышкы-шон PRON_  "" ;
кыштакен+Pron:кыштакен PRON_  "" ;
кышты+Pron:кышты PRON_  "" ;
кышты-тиштӹ+Pron:кышты-тиштӹ PRON_  "" ;
кышты-ӓнят+Pron:кышты-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
кӱ+Pron:кӱ PRON_  "kuka" ;
кӱ-шон+Pron:кӱ-шон PRON_  "" ;
ма+Pron:ма PRON_  "mikä" ;
ма-шон+Pron:ма-шон PRON_  "jokin" ;
мааш+Pron:мааш PRON_  "" ;
магӹц-ӓнят+Pron:магӹц-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
мазар-гӹнят+Pron:мазар-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkin verran" ;
мазараш+Pron:мазараш PRON_  "minkä hintainen" ;
мазары+Pron:мазары PRON_  "miten paljon" ;
малан-гӹнят+Pron:малан-гӹнят PRON_  "jonkin takia" ;
малын+Pron:малын PRON_  "miksi" ;
маняр-гӹнят+Pron:маняр-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
маняраш+Pron:маняраш PRON_  "" ;
манярымшы+Pron:манярымшы PRON_  "" ;
махань-гӹнят+Pron:махань-гӹнят PRON_  "minkälainen tahansa" ;
махань-шон+Pron:махань-шон PRON_  "" ;
маханьы+Pron:маханьы PRON_  "minkälainen" ;
молнамшы+Pron:молнамшы PRON_  "aikaisempi" ;
молы+Pron:молы PRON_  "muu" ;
мӓ+Pron:мӓ PERS-PL1  "me" ;
мӹнь+Pron:мӹ PERS-SG1  "minä" ;
нигыды+Pron:нигыды PRON_  "" ;
нигыце+Pron:нигыце PRON_  "mitenkään" ;
нигышак+Pron:нигышак PRON_  "mihinkään" ;
нигышкы+Pron:нигышкы PRON_  "mihinkään" ;
нигышты+Pron:нигышты PRON_  "missään" ;
нима+Pron:нима PRON_  "mikään" ;
нималан+Pron:нималан PRON_  "millekään" ;
нимат+Pron:нимат PRON_  "ei mikään" ;
нинӹ+Pron:нинӹ DEM-SG  "nämä" ;
нӹнӹ+Pron:нӹнӹ PERS-PL3  "he" ;
нӹнӹ+Pron:нӹнӹ DEM-PL  "nuo" ;
седӹ+Pron:седӹ DEM-SG  "tuo" ;
седӹге+Pron:седӹге PRON_  "" ;
седӹндон+Pron:седӹндон PRON_  "sen takia" ;
седӹнӓр+Pron:седӹнӓр PRON_  "" ;
седӹхень+Pron:седӹхень PRON_  "" ;
тагыды+Pron:тагыды PRON_  "jokin" ;
тагыды-кынам+Pron:тагыды-кынам PRON_  "" ;
тагынам+Pron:тагынам PRON_  "milloin" ;
тагынам-ӓнят+Pron:тагынам-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
тагынамшы+Pron:тагынамшы PRON_  "" ;
тагыце-гӹнят+Pron:тагыце-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
тагыш+Pron:тагыш PRON_  "johonkin" ;
тагышак-гӹнят+Pron:тагышак-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
тагышакен+Pron:тагышакен PRON_  "" ;
тагышец-гӹнят+Pron:тагышец-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
тагышецӹн+Pron:тагышецӹн PRON_  "jostakin" ;
тагышкевек-ӓнят+Pron:тагышкевек-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
тагышты+Pron:тагышты PRON_  "" ;
тагышты-ӓнят+Pron:тагышты-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
тама-гӹнят+Pron:тама-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
тамазар+Pron:тамазар PRON_  "" ;
тамалан-гӹнят+Pron:тамалан-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
тамалын+Pron:тамалын PRON_  "" ;
тамалын-ӓнят+Pron:тамалын-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
таманяр-гӹнят+Pron:таманяр-гӹнят PRON_  "" ;
таманяреш+Pron:таманяреш PRON_  "" ;
таманярын+Pron:таманярын PRON_  "" ;
тамахань+Pron:тамахань PRON_  "" ;
тамахань-ӓнят+Pron:тамахань-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
теве+Pron:теве PRON_  "" ;
тенгелӓ+Pron:тенгелӓ PRON_  "niinpä" ;
техеньӹ+Pron:техеньӹ PRON_  "sellainen" ;
тигытлашты+Pron:тигытлашты PRON_  "" ;
тидӹ+Pron:ти DEM-SG  "tämä" ;
тинӓрӹ+Pron:тинӓрӹ PRON_  "niin paljon" ;
тишец+Pron:тишец PRON_  "" ;
тишкевек+Pron:тишкевек PRON_  "tähän asti" ;
тиштӓкен+Pron:тиштӓкен PRON_  "täällä" ;
тишӓк+Pron:тишӓк PRON_  "tähän" ;
тӓ+Pron:тӓ PERS-PL2  "te" ;
тӓгӱ+Pron:тӓгӱ PRON_  "joku" ;
тӓгӱ-ӓнят+Pron:тӓгӱ-ӓнят PRON_  "" ;
тӹвекӹ+Pron:тӹвекӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹвелнӹ+Pron:тӹвелнӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹвелӓн+Pron:тӹвелӓн PRON_  "" ;
тӹвецӹн+Pron:тӹвецӹн PRON_  "" ;
тӹгодшы+Pron:тӹгодшы PRON_  "" ;
тӹгодымшы+Pron:тӹгодымшы PRON_  "" ;
тӹгытлаэш+Pron:тӹгытлаэш PRON_  "" ;
тӹдӹ+Pron:тӹдӹ PERS-SG3  "hän" ;
тӹдӹ+Pron:тӹ DEM-SG  "tuo" ;
тӹнгелӓ+Pron:тӹнгелӓ PRON_  "" ;
тӹнь+Pron:тӹ PERS-SG2  "" ;
тӹньӹ+Pron:тӹньӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹнӓмеш+Pron:тӹнӓмеш PRON_  "" ;
тӹнӓмшӹ+Pron:тӹнӓмшӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹнӓрӓш+Pron:тӹнӓрӓш PRON_  "" ;
тӹнӓрӹкӹ+Pron:тӹнӓрӹкӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹун+Pron:тӹун PRON_  "" ;
тӹхеньӹ+Pron:тӹхеньӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹшец-тишец+Pron:тӹшец-тишец PRON_  "" ;
тӹшкевек+Pron:тӹшкевек PRON_  "" ;
тӹшкӓн-тӹшкӓн+Pron:тӹшкӓн-тӹшкӓн PRON_  "" ;
тӹшкӹ-тишкӹ+Pron:тӹшкӹ-тишкӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹштӹ+Pron:тӹштӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹштӹшӹ+Pron:тӹштӹшӹ PRON_  "" ;
тӹшӓкен+Pron:тӹшӓкен PRON_  "" ;
хоть-кынам+Pron:хоть-кынам PRON_  "" ;
хоть-кынар+Pron:хоть-кынар PRON_  "" ;
хоть-кышак+Pron:хоть-кышак PRON_  "" ;
хоть-кышкы+Pron:хоть-кышкы PRON_  "" ;
хоть-кӱ+Pron:хоть-кӱ PRON_  "" ;
хоть-маняр+Pron:хоть-маняр PRON_  "" ;
хоть-махань+Pron:хоть-махань PRON_  "" ;
цилӓ+Pron:цилӓ PRON_  "kaikki" ;
юж+Pron:юж PRON_  "" ;
южнам+Pron:южнам PRON_  "joskus" ;
ӓнят-кыды+Pron:ӓнят-кыды PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-кынары+Pron:ӓнят-кынары PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-кышакен+Pron:ӓнят-кышакен PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-кышецын+Pron:ӓнят-кышецын PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-кышты+Pron:ӓнят-кышты PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-кӱ+Pron:ӓнят-кӱ PRON_  "joku" ;
ӓнят-мазар+Pron:ӓнят-мазар PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-маняр+Pron:ӓнят-маняр PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-махань+Pron:ӓнят-махань PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-тама+Pron:ӓнят-тама PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-тамазары+Pron:ӓнят-тамазары PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-таманяр+Pron:ӓнят-таманяр PRON_  "" ;
ӓнят-тамахань+Pron:ӓнят-тамахань PRON_  "jonkinlainen" ;
ӹшке+Pron:ӹшк REFL  "itse" ;
